Connecticut, session 2026, SB00161.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
thirty five thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection for the
purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to the Marlborough Fire
Department in the town of Marlborough to complete purchases and
projects.